src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"suffix-final vowel realized %{оы%}:ы "
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  %{оы%}:ы <=>  Cns ((ʼ:) ь:) _ %> [ л | н | р | г | ш | ж | д | м | Ы1: ] ;

"stem-final vowel realized %{оы%}:о"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  %{оы%}:о <=> Cns ((ʼ:) ь:) _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;

"suffix-final vowel realized %{яы%}:ы "
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  %{яы%}:ы <=>  [Cns (ʼ:) ь| Vow (•:) й] _ %>: [ л | н | р | г | ш | д | м | Ы1: ] ;
        
"stem-final vowel realized %{яы%}:я"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  %{яы%}:я <=> [Cns (ʼ:) ь:| Vow (•:) 0:] _ [ %^END: | %- ] ;

!!€ башнь%{яы%}
!!€ башн0я

"stem-internal glide realized in  0:й %{яы%}:ы "
!! **@RULENAME@**
  0:й <=> Vow (•:) _ [ %{яы%}:ы | %{еы%}:ы | %{аы%}:ы] ;

!!€ а0%{яы%}%>Ы1м
!!€ айы%>0м




"Clitics in At and Ak take onset glide = a"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  А2:а <=>
   [з2:|н2:|к2:|т2: | CnsNoj ( Ы2:0 |%{аы%}:|%{еы%}:|%{оы%}:|%{ӧы%}:)| Е2:е|Е2:э|[е|э|о|ӧ|ӱ|и|ю|у] (•:) ] %> _ [ н | т | к | м | ш | л | %^END: ] ;
!   [CnsNoj ( Ы2:0 |%{аы%}:|%{еы%}:|%{оы%}:|%{ӧы%}:)| Е2:е|Е2:э|[е|э|о|ӧ|ӱ|и|ю|у] (•:) ] %> _ [ н | т | к | м | ш | л | %^END: ] ;
! [ CnsNoj ( Ы2:0 |%{аы%}:ы|%{еы%}:|%{оы%}:|%{ӧы%}:)| Е2:е|Е2:э|[е|э|о|ӧ|ӱ|и|ю|у] (•:) ] %> _ [ н | т | к | м | ш | л | %^END: ] ;
! Line 1 was out, line 2 was in, switching due to альфат Foc/at. Follow this rule. TT, JB.
 
"Clitics in At and Ak take onset glide = ja"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  А2:я <=>
  [CnsNoj (ʼ:) ь:|й:0 ] (Ы2:0 |%{аы%}:0|%{еы%}:0|%{оы%}:0|%{ӧы%}:0) %> _ [н|т|к|м|ш|л|%^END:] ;
                                              [н|л] %> %{ьØ%}: Ы2:  %> _ [н|т|к|м|ш|л|%^END:] ;
!! когыльо+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/Ат
!!€ когыль%{оы%}%>А2т
!!€ когыл00%>ят
!! толаш+V+Ind+Prt1+Sg3+Foc/Ат
!!€ тол>{ьØ}Ы2>А2т
!!€ тол>00>ят
!! имне+N+Sg+Nom+Foc/Ат
!!€ и•мнʼь%{еы%}>А2т
!!€ и0мн000>ят

! "A2 as я in й-final stems"
!           й: (%{аы%}:|%{еы%}:|%{оы%}:|%{ӧы%}:) %> _  ;
           й: (%{аы%}:0|%{еы%}:0|%{оы%}:0|%{ӧы%}:0) %> _  ;

"Clitics in At and Ak take ZERO"
!! **@RULENAME@**
  А2:0 <=> [а|я] (•:) %> _ [ т | к | м | ш ] ;

!А2 э Е2 > Ш {аы} > _ т
! я э э  > Ш  а   > _ т

"й Deletion in front of я Suffix and others"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
  й:0 <=> _ [%> (:0)|(:0) %> ] [ А2: | :е | :и | :ю ]  ;
!          _     (:0) [ :я | :е | :и | :ю ] [ %^END: | %- ] ;

!!€ кий>А2ш
!!€ ки0>яш

!"йа suffix as я 1"
!! **@RULENAME@**
!й:0 <=> Vow (•:) _ %>: а: ;

!"йа suffix as я 2"
!! **@RULENAME@**
!а:я <=> Vow (•:) й: %>: _ ;

!!€ кай>А2
!!€ ка0>я 

!!€ кутыр>А2
!!€ кутыр>а 



! Devoicing
"Onset consonant devoicing ж:ш "
!! **@RULENAME@**
ж:ш <=> :Cst (ь) (:0)  %> _ [ Ы2: | а | ы %> ] ;
!!€ авалтымаш%>жы%>ла
!!€ авалтымаш%>шы%>ла
   %^Obstruent: %- %> _ [ Ы2: | а | ы %> ] ;

"Onset consonant devoicing з:с "
!! **@RULENAME@**
з:с <=> :Cst (:0) %> _ :Vow ;

! Consonant loss
"Stem-final consonant loss т"
!! **@RULENAME@**
т2:0 <=> [ к ] _ [%> [м|ш|д|н|ж:ш|з:с|с]|%^END:| %- я н] ;

"Stem-final consonant variation т2:т"
т2:т <=> _ %> [А2:а|Е2:е|(%{ьØ%}:) ы| (%{ьØ%}:) Ы2:];

"Stem-final consonant loss к"
!! **@RULENAME@**
к2:0 <=> [ ш |ч ] _ [%> [м|ш|д|н|ж:ш|з:с|с]|%^END:| %- я н] ;

"Stem-final consonant variation к2:к"
к2:к <=> _ %> [А2:а|Е2:е|(%{ьØ%}:) ы| (%{ьØ%}:) Ы2:];

"Stem-final consonant loss н"
!! **@RULENAME@**
н2:0 <=> _ ч [%> [м|ш|д|н|ж:ш|з:с|с]|%^END:| %- я н] ;

"Stem-final consonant variation н2:н"
н2:н <=> _ ч %> [А2:а|Е2:е|(%{ьØ%}:) ы| (%{ьØ%}:) Ы2:];


"Stem-final consonant variation з:ч"
з2:ч <=> Vow (•:) _  [%> [м|ш|д|н|ж:ш|з:с|с]|%^END:| %- я н] ;

"Stem-final consonant variation з2:з"
з2:з <=> _ %> [А2:а|Е2:е|(%{ьØ%}:) ы| (%{ьØ%}:) Ы2:о];

!!€ колхоз
!!€ колхоз

!!€ воз2^END
!!€ воч0

!!€ воз2>аш
!!€ воз>аш

!!€ камвоз2>аш
!!€ камвоз>аш

!!€ воз2>са
!!€ воч>са

 "Disallow PxSg3 in ж no where except after :Vow "
 !! **@RULENAME@**
 ж:ж /<= [:Ltrs - :Vow] %> _ [%^END:| %-|%>]  ;
 !!€ ава>ж>де
 !!$ кол>ж>де



 "Disallow after vowels PxSg3 combinations with dative -жылан, etc."
 !! **@RULENAME@**
 ж:ж /<= [:Vow (•:)] %> _ [ы д|ы л|ы г|ы %> д|ы %> л|ы %> г]  ;
 !!€ кол>жы>лан
 !!$ ава>жы>лан



 
"Disallow Sg+Ine in тЫ2 everywhere except after stem-final ш "
!! **@RULENAME@**
т:т /<= [Ltrs - ш ] (•:) %> _ Ы2:  ;
!! йӧратымаш+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ йӧратымаш%>тЫ2
!!€ йӧратымаш%>те
 

"Disallow Sg+Ill in кЫ2 everywhere except after stem-final ш "
!! **@RULENAME@**
к:к /<= [Ltrs - ш ] (•:) %> _ Ы2:  ;
!! авалтымаш+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ авалтымаш%>кЫ2
!!€ авалтымаш%>ке


"Disallow PxSg3 in ыж no where except after ш "
!! **@RULENAME@**
ы:ы /<=
 [Ltrs - ш] (•:) %> _ ж: (Ы2:) [%^END:| %-|%>]  ;
!!€ йолташ%>ыж#
!!€ йолташ%>ыж#
!!$ олма%>ыж#
!!$ олма%>ыж#

!"Disallow PxSg3 in жы after vowels "
!! **@RULENAME@**
! ы:ы /<=
! Vow (•:) %> ж: _ %> [д е|л а|г е]  ;
! !!€ кол%>жы%>де
! !!€ кол%>жы%>де
! !!$ ава%>жы%>де
! !!$ ава%>жы%>де


"Disallow %^V2IMPRT й-final Imprt+Sg2 single-syllable -em verbs "
!! **@RULENAME@**                                                                                                                                                                           
%^V2IMPRT:0 /<= [Cns: - й|ь] %> _ ;

 
!DIS ! This rule gives error (cf. Introduction of %^V2IMPRT:0 to deal with single-syllable -em verbs in й.)
!DIS !"Disallow %^V2IMPRT й-final Imprt+Sg2 single-syllable -em verbs "
!DIS !! __ @RULENAME@ __
!DIS !%^V2IMPRT:0 /<= _ ;
!DIS ! except .#. (Cns) [у|ӱ|ӧ|о|е|э|ю|и|ы] (•:) й %> _ ;


!!€ и•мнʼь%{еы%}>A2т
!!€ и0мн000>ят

!!€ и • м н ʼ ь %{еы%} > A2 т
!!€ и 0 м н 0 0 0      > я  т

! just to see whether other tests pass:
!!€ а
!!€ б


!"Only optionalise soft sign after consonant"
!ʼ:0 <=> :Cns _ ;
! no need 2020-12-04
